Florida, session 2026, HB845.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 402.3216, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
402.3216 Child Care Cost and Affordability Study.—
(1) Beginning July 1, 2026, the Office of Program Policy
Analysis and Government Accountability (OPPAGA) shall perform a
study of public and private child care assistance programs for
employees to evaluate the costs and affordability of the
programs and effects on school readiness. The study's scope must
include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:
(a) The characteristics of other states' programs.
(b) The potential benefits of a Florida program.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb845-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 845 2026
(c) The potential effects of a Florida program on:
1. The state's school readiness program.
2. The state's child care workforce.
3. Childcare regulation and licensing.
(2) In conducting the study, OPPAGA must consult with the
school readiness program within the Department of Education, the
child care licensing program within the Department of Children
and Families, the Florida Chamber of Commerce, and any other
entity OPPAGA deems relevant.
(3) By January 30, 2027, OPPAGA shall submit a report to
the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of
the House of Representatives that details the findings of the
study and includes recommendations and potential options for a
state program to enhance school readiness, increase the
affordability of childcare assistance, and contain state costs.
(4) This section is repealed October 1, 2027.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb845-00